California statutes. Corporations Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, when a corporation has not issued any memberships, a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or have been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators, may sign and verify a certificate of dissolution stating all of the following:

(1) That the certificate of dissolution is being filed within 24 months from the date the articles of incorporation were filed.

(2) That the corporation does not have any debts or other liabilities, except as provided in paragraph (3) and subdivision (d).

(3) That the tax liability will be satisfied on a taxes-paid basis or that a person or corporation or other business entity assumes the tax liability, if any, of the dissolving corporation and is responsible for additional corporate taxes, if any, that are assessed and that become due after the date of the assumption of the tax liability.

(4) That a final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(5) That the corporation was created in error.

(6) That the known assets of the corporation remaining after payment
 of, or adequately providing for, known debts and liabilities have been distributed as required by law or that the corporation acquired no known assets, as the case may be.

(7) That a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or have been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators authorized the dissolution and elected to dissolve the corporation.

(8) That the corporation has not issued any memberships, and if the corporation has received payments for memberships, those payments have been returned to those making the payments.

(9) That the corporation is dissolved.

(b) A certificate of dissolution signed and
 verified pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board and the Attorney General’s Registry of Charities and Fundraisers of the dissolution.

(c) Upon filing a certificate of dissolution pursuant to subdivision (b), a corporation shall be dissolved and its powers, rights, and privileges shall cease.

(d) Notwithstanding the dissolution of a corporation pursuant to this section, its liability to creditors, if any, is not discharged. The liability of the directors of, or other persons related to, the dissolved corporation is not discharged. The dissolution of a corporation pursuant to this section shall not diminish or adversely affect the ability of the Attorney General to enforce liabilities as otherwise
 provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 19.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6611.

(a) Whenever a corporation has elected to wind up and dissolve a certificate evidencing that election shall forthwith be filed and a copy thereof filed with the Attorney General.

(b) The certificate shall be an officers’ certificate or shall be signed and verified by at least a majority of the directors then in office or by one or more members authorized to do so by approval of a majority of all members (Section 5033) and shall set forth:

(1) That the corporation has elected to wind up and dissolve.

(2) If the election was made by the vote of members alone,
 the number of votes for the election and that the election was made by a majority of all members (Section 5033).

(3) If the election was made by the board and members pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6610, or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 9680, the certificate shall state that it was made by the board and the members in accordance with Section 5034.

(4) If the certificate is executed by a member or members, that the subscribing person or persons were authorized to execute the certificate by a majority of all members (Section 5033).

(5) If the election was made by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6610, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 9680, the circumstances showing the corporation to be within one of the categories described in
 that subdivision.

(c) If an election to dissolve made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6610 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 9680 is made by the vote of all the members of a corporation with members or by all members of the board of a corporation without members pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6610, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 9680 and a statement to that effect is added to the certificate of dissolution pursuant to Section 6615, the separate filing of the certificate of election pursuant to this section is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 13.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6612.

(a) A voluntary election to wind up and dissolve may be revoked prior to distribution of any assets: (1) if the election was made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6610, by the vote of a majority of all members (Section 5033); or (2) if the election was made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6610, by the approval of the board and the members (Section 5034); or (3) if the election was by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6610, by approval of the board. Thereupon a certificate evidencing the revocation shall be signed, verified and filed in the manner prescribed by Section 6611 and a copy thereof filed with the Attorney General.

(b) The certificate shall set forth:

(1) That the corporation has revoked its election to wind up and dissolve.

(2) That no assets have been distributed pursuant to the election.

(3) If the revocation was made by the vote of members alone, the number of votes for the revocation and that the revocation was made by a majority of all members (Section 5033).

(4) If the revocation was made by the board and members pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6612, the certificate shall so state.

(5) If the revocation was made by the board alone, the certificate shall so state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

6613.

(a) Voluntary proceedings for winding up the corporation commence upon the adoption of the resolution required by Section 6610 by the members, by the board and members, or by the board alone, electing to wind up and dissolve.

(b) When a voluntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the board shall continue to act as a board and shall have full powers to wind up and settle its affairs, both before and after the filing of the certificate of dissolution.

(c) When a voluntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the corporation shall cease to conduct its activities except to the extent necessary for the beneficial winding up thereof, to the extent necessary to carry out its purposes and except during such period as the board may deem necessary to preserve the corporation’s goodwill or going-concern value pending a sale or other disposition of its assets, or both, in whole or in part. The board shall cause written notice of the commencement of the proceeding for voluntary winding up to be given by mail to all its members (except no notice need be given to the members who voted in favor of winding up and dissolving the corporation), to all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the corporation, and to the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6614.

If a corporation is in the process of voluntary winding up, the superior court of the proper county, upon the petition of (a) the corporation, or (b) the authorized number (Section 5036), or (c) the Attorney General, or (d) three or more creditors, and upon such notice to the corporation and to other persons interested in the corporation as members and creditors as the court may order, may take jurisdiction over such voluntary winding up proceeding if that appears necessary for the protection of any parties in interest or if it appears necessary to protect the purpose or purposes served by the corporation. The court, if it assumes jurisdiction, may make such orders as to any and all matters concerning the winding up of the affairs of the corporation and the protection of its creditors, its assets and its purpose or purposes as justice and equity may require. The provisions of Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 6510) (except Sections 6510 and 6511) shall apply to such court proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6615.

(a) When a corporation has been completely wound up without court proceedings, a majority of the directors then in office shall sign and verify a certificate of dissolution stating:

(1) That the corporation has been completely wound up.

(2) That its known debts and liabilities have been actually paid, or adequately provided for, or paid or adequately provided for as far as its assets permitted, or that it has incurred no known debts or liabilities, as the case may be. If there are known debts or liabilities for payment of which adequate provision has been made, the certificate shall state what provision has been made,
 setting forth the name and address of the corporation, person or governmental agency that has assumed or guaranteed the payment, or the name and address of the depositary with which deposit has been made or other information as may be necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability.

(3) That the corporation is dissolved.

(4) That all final returns required under the Revenue and Taxation Code have been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board.

 (5) That the corporation, if applicable, is a committee, as defined in Section 82013 of the Government Code, that is required to and does file any statement pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 84200) of Chapter 4 of Title 9 of the Government Code and is exempt
 from the supervisory authority of the Attorney General pursuant to Sections 12581 and 12583 of the Government Code and is exempt from and not required to file the attachment specified in subdivision (b).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), one of the following documents issued by the Attorney General shall be attached to the certificate of dissolution:

(1) A written waiver of objections to the distribution of the corporation’s assets pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 6716.

(2) A written confirmation that the corporation has no assets.

(c) The certificate of dissolution and attachment described in subdivision (b) shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall not accept a certificate of dissolution for filing without
 this attachment unless the attachment is not required as specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a). The corporate existence shall cease upon the acceptance of the filing of the certificate of dissolution and, if required, the attachment, by the Secretary of State, except for the purpose of further winding up if needed. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 12.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6616.

Except as otherwise provided by law, if the term of existence for which any corporation was organized expires without renewal or extension thereof, the board shall terminate its activities and wind up its affairs; and when the affairs of the corporation have been wound up a majority of the directors shall execute and file a certificate conforming to the requirements of Section 6615.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6617.

(a) The board, in lieu of filing the certificate of dissolution, may petition the superior court of the proper county for an order declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved. Such petition shall be filed in the name of the corporation.

(b) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall make an order requiring all persons, including the Attorney General, interested to show cause why an order shall not be made declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved and shall direct that the order be served by notice to all creditors, claimants and members in the same manner as the notice given under subdivision (b) of Section 6517. Notice shall be served upon the Attorney General.

(c) Any person claiming to be interested as creditor or otherwise may appear in the proceeding at any time before the expiration of 30 days from the completion of publication of the order to show cause and contest the petition, and upon failure to appear such person’s claim shall be barred.

(d) Thereafter an order shall be entered and filed and have the effect as prescribed in Sections 6518 and 6519.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6618.

(a) A corporation in the process of voluntary winding up may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

(b) The written notice to known creditors and claimants required by subdivision (c) of Section 6613 shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Describe any information that must be included in a claim.

(2) Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent.

(3) State the deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the corporation must receive the claim.

(4) State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(c) A claim against the corporation is barred if any of the following occur:

(1) A claimant who has been given the written notice under subdivision (b) does not deliver the claim to the corporation by the deadline.

(2) A claimant whose claim was rejected by the corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

(d) For purposes of this section “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. General Provisions Relating to Dissolution [6710. - 6721.]

6710.

The powers and duties of the directors (or other persons appointed by the court pursuant to Section 6515) and officers after commencement of a dissolution proceeding include, but are not limited to, the following acts in the name and on behalf of the corporation:

(a) To elect officers and to employ agents and attorneys to liquidate or wind up its affairs.

(b) To continue the conduct of the affairs of the corporation insofar as necessary for the disposal or winding up thereof.

(c) To carry out contracts and collect, pay, compromise and settle debts and claims for or against the corporation.

(d) To defend suits brought against the corporation.

(e) To sue, in the name of the corporation, for all sums due or owing to the corporation or to recover any of its property.

(f) To collect any amounts remaining unpaid on memberships or to recover unlawful distributions.

(g) Subject to the provisions of Section 5142, to sell at public or private sale, exchange, convey or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation for an amount deemed reasonable by the board without compliance with the provisions of Section 5911, and to execute bills of sale and deeds of conveyance in the name of the corporation.

(h) In general, to make contracts and to do any and all things in the name of the corporation which may be proper or convenient for the purposes of winding up, settling and liquidating the affairs of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

6711.

A vacancy on the board may be filled during a winding up proceeding in the manner provided in Section 5224.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6712.

When the identity of the directors or their right to hold office is in doubt, or if they are dead or unable to act, or they fail or refuse to act or their whereabouts cannot be ascertained, any interested person, including the Attorney General, may petition the superior court of the proper county to determine the identity of the directors or, if there are no directors, to appoint directors to wind up the affairs of the corporation, after hearing upon such notice to such persons as the court may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6713.

(a) After determining that all the known debts and liabilities of a corporation in the process of winding up have been paid or adequately provided for, the board shall distribute all the remaining corporate assets in the manner provided in Sections 6715 and 6716.

(b) If the winding up is by court proceeding or subject to court supervision, the distribution shall not be made until after the expiration of any period for the presentation of claims that has been prescribed by order of the court.

(c) Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, assets, if any, which are not subject to attachment, execution or sale for the corporation’s debts and liabilities may be distributed pursuant to Sections 6715 and 6716 even though all debts and liabilities have not been paid or adequately provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6714.

The payment of a debt or liability, whether the whereabouts of the creditor is known or unknown, has been adequately provided for if the payment has been provided for by either of the following means:

(a) Payment thereof has been assumed or guaranteed in good faith by one or more financially responsible persons or by the United States government or any agency thereof, and the provision (including the financial responsibility of such persons) was determined in good faith and with reasonable care by the board to be adequate at the time of any distribution of the assets by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The amount of the debt or liability has been deposited as provided in Section 6718.

This section does not prescribe the exclusive means of making adequate provision for debts and liabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

6715.

After complying with the provisions of Section 6713, assets held by a corporation upon a valid condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition has occurred or will occur by reason of the dissolution, shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with the condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6716.

After complying with the provisions of Section 6713:

(a) Except as provided in Section 6715, all of a corporation’s assets shall be disposed of on dissolution in conformity with its articles or bylaws subject to complying with the provisions of any trust under which such assets are held.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the disposition required in subdivision (a) shall be made by decree of the superior court of the proper county in proceedings to which the Attorney General is a party. The decree shall be made upon petition therefor by the Attorney General or, upon 30 days’ notice to the Attorney General, by any person concerned in
 the dissolution.

(c) The disposition required in subdivision (a) may be made without the decree of the superior court, subject to the rights of persons concerned in the dissolution, if the Attorney General makes a written waiver of objections to the disposition.

 (d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not be applicable to any corporation as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 6615.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 13.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6717.

Subject to the provisions of any trust under which assets to be distributed are held, distribution may be made either in money or in property or securities and either in installments from time to time or as a whole, if this can be done fairly and ratably and in conformity with the provisions of the articles and bylaws and shall be made as soon as reasonably consistent with the beneficial liquidation of the corporation’s assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6718.

(a) If any creditors or other persons are unknown or fail or refuse to accept their payment or distribution in cash or property or their whereabouts cannot be ascertained after diligent inquiry, or the existence or amount of a claim of a creditor or other person is contingent, contested, or not determined, the corporation may deposit any such payment, distribution, or the maximum amount of the claim with the Controller in trust for the benefit of those lawfully entitled to the payment, distribution, or the amount of the claim. The payment or distribution shall be paid over by the depositary to the lawful owners, their representatives or assigns, upon satisfactory proof of title.

(b) For the purpose of providing for the transmittal, receipt, accounting for, claiming, management, and investment of all money or other property deposited with the Controller under subdivision (a), the money or other property shall be deemed to be paid or delivered for deposit with the Controller under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and may be recovered in the manner prescribed in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6719.

(a) Whenever in the process of winding up a corporation any distribution of assets has been made, otherwise than under an order of court, without prior payment or adequate provision for payment of any of the debts and liabilities of the corporation, any amount so improperly distributed to any person may be recovered by the corporation. Any of such persons may be joined as defendants in the same action or be brought in on the motion of any other defendant.

(b) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability under subdivision (a) against any or all persons receiving the distribution by the Attorney General or by any one or more creditors of the corporation, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment.

(c) As used in this section, “process of winding up” includes proceedings under Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 6510) and 16 (commencing with Section 6610) and also any other distribution of assets to persons made in contemplation of termination or abandonment of the corporate business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6720.

(a) A corporation which is dissolved nevertheless continues to exist for the purpose of winding up its affairs, prosecuting and defending actions by or against it and enabling it to collect and discharge obligations, dispose of and convey its property and collect and divide its assets, but not for the purpose of continuing its activities except so far as necessary for the winding up thereof.

(b) No action or proceeding to which a corporation is a party abates by the dissolution of the corporation or by reason of proceedings for winding up and dissolution thereof.

(c) Any assets inadvertently or otherwise omitted from the winding up continue in the dissolved corporation for the benefit of the persons entitled thereto upon dissolution of the corporation and on realization shall be distributed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6721.

(a) In all cases where a corporation has been dissolved, any person to whom assets were distributed upon dissolution may be sued in the corporate name upon any cause of action against the corporation arising prior to its dissolution. Notice of such action shall be given to the Attorney General who may intervene. This section is procedural in nature and is not intended to determine liability.

(b) Summons or other process against such a corporation may be served by delivering a copy thereof to an officer, director or person having charge of its assets or, if no such person can be found, to any agent upon whom process might be served at the time of dissolution. If none of such persons can be found with due diligence and it is so shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court, then the court may make an order that summons or other process be served upon the dissolved corporation by personally delivering a copy thereof, together with a copy of the order, to the Secretary of State or an assistant or deputy secretary of state. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after the delivery of process to the Secretary of State. A copy of any summons or other process shall be served on the Attorney General.

(c) Every such corporation shall survive and continue to exist indefinitely for the purpose of being sued in any quiet title action. Any judgment rendered in any such action shall bind each and every person having an interest in such corporation, to the extent of their interest therein, and such action shall have the same force and effect as an action brought under the provisions of Sections 410.50 and 410.60 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Service of summons or other process in any such action may be made as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure or as provided in subdivision (b).

(d) Upon receipt of such process and the fee therefor, the Secretary of State forthwith shall give notice to the corporation as provided in Section 1702.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Crimes and Penalties [6810. - 6815.]

6810.

(a) Upon the failure of a corporation to file the statement required by Section 6210, the Secretary of State shall provide a notice of that delinquency to the corporation. The notice shall also contain information concerning the application of this section, and advise the corporation of the penalty imposed by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for failure to timely file the required statement after notice of delinquency has been provided by the Secretary of State. If, within 60 days after providing the notice of delinquency, a statement pursuant to Section 6210 has not been filed by the corporation, the Secretary of State shall certify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Upon certification
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall assess against the corporation a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) pursuant to Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) The penalty herein provided shall not apply to a corporation that on or prior to the date of certification pursuant to subdivision (a) has dissolved, has converted to another type of business entity, or has been merged into another corporation or other business entity.

(d) The penalty herein provided shall not apply and the Secretary of State need not provide a notice of the delinquency to a corporation the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of which have been suspended by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the last day of the filing period pursuant to Section 6210. The Secretary of
 State need not provide notice of the filing requirement pursuant to Section 6210 to a corporation the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of which have been so suspended by the Franchise Tax Board on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the day the Secretary of State prepares the notice for sending.

(e) If, after certification pursuant to subdivision (a), the Secretary of State finds the required statement was filed before the expiration of the 60-day period after providing notice of the delinquency, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall then promptly abate any penalty assessed against the corporation pursuant to Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) If the Secretary of State determines that the failure of a corporation to file a statement required by Section 6210 is
 excusable because of reasonable cause or unusual circumstances that justify the failure, the Secretary of State may waive the penalty imposed by this section and by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, in which case the Secretary of State shall not certify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board, or if already certified, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 14.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6811.

Any director of any corporation who concurs in any vote or act of the directors of the corporation or any of them, knowingly and with dishonest or fraudulent purpose, to make any distribution with the design of defrauding creditors, members, or the corporation, is guilty of a crime. Each such crime is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 40.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

6812.

(a) Every director or officer of any corporation is guilty of a crime if such director or officer knowingly concurs in making or publishing, either generally or privately, to members or other persons (1) any materially false report or statement as to the financial condition of the corporation, or (2) any willfully or fraudulently exaggerated report, account or statement of operations or financial condition, intended to induce and having a tendency to induce, contributions or donations to the corporation by members or other persons.

(b) Every director or officer of any corporation is guilty of a crime who refuses to make or direct to be made any book entry or the posting of any notice required by law in the manner required by law.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of this section shall be punishable by imprisonment in state prison or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6813.

(a) Every director, officer or agent of any corporation, who knowingly receives or acquires possession of any property of the corporation, otherwise than in payment of a just demand, and, with intent to defraud, omits to make, or to cause or direct to be made, a full and true entry thereof in the books or accounts of the corporation is guilty of a crime.

(b) Every director, officer, agent or member of any corporation who, with intent to defraud, destroys, alters, mutilates or falsifies any of the books, papers, writings or securities belonging to the corporation or makes or concurs in omitting to make any material entry in any book of accounts or other record or document kept by the corporation is guilty of a crime.

(c) Each crime specified in this section is punishable by imprisonment in state prison, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not exceeding one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6814.

Every director, officer or agent of any corporation, or any person proposing to organize such a corporation, who knowingly exhibits any false, forged or altered book, paper, voucher, security or other instrument of evidence to any public officer or board authorized by law to examine the organization of such corporation or to investigate its affairs, with intent to deceive such officer or board in respect thereto, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 41.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

6815.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime under any other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Foreign Corporations [6910. - 6910.]

6910.

Foreign corporations transacting intrastate business shall comply with Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1, except as to matters specifically otherwise provided for in this part and except that Section 2115 shall not be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 187, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 3. NONPROFIT MUTUAL BENEFIT CORPORATIONS [7110. - 8910.]



  CHAPTER 1. Organization and Bylaws [7110. - 7160.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title and Purposes [7110. - 7111.]

7110.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7111.

Subject to any other provision of law of this state applying to the particular class of corporation or line of activity, a corporation may be formed under this part for any lawful purpose; provided that a corporation all of the assets of which are irrevocably dedicated to charitable, religious, or public purposes and which as a matter of law or according to its articles or bylaws must, upon dissolution, distribute its assets to a person or persons carrying on a charitable, religious, or public purpose or purposes may not be formed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation [7120. - 7122.3.]

7120.

(a) One or more persons may form a corporation under this part by executing and filing articles of incorporation.

(b) If initial directors are named in the articles, each director named in the articles shall sign and acknowledge the articles; if initial directors are not named in the articles, the articles shall be signed by one or more persons who thereupon are the incorporators of the corporation.

(c) The corporate existence begins upon the filing of the articles and continues perpetually, unless otherwise expressly provided by law or in the articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1085, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.

(a) In the case of an existing unincorporated association, the association may change its status to that of a corporation upon a proper authorization for such by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures.

(b) In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the articles pursuant to Section 7130, the articles in the case of an incorporation authorized by subdivision (a) shall set forth that an existing unincorporated association, stating its name, is being incorporated by the filing of the articles.

(c) The articles filed pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by a verified statement of any two officers or governing board members of the association stating that the incorporation of the association by means of the articles to which the verified statement is attached has been approved by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures.

(d) Upon the change of status of an unincorporated association to a corporation pursuant to subdivision (a), the property of the association becomes the property of the corporation and the members of the association who had any voting rights of the type referred to in Section 5056 become members of the corporation. 

(e) The filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the association is located, of a copy of the articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section, certified by the Secretary of State, shall evidence record ownership in the corporation of all interests of the association in and to the real property located in that county.

(f) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the association shall be preserved unimpaired. Any action or proceeding pending by or against the unincorporated association may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the corporation, or the corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(g) If a corporation is organized by a person who is or was an officer, director or member of an unincorporated association and such corporation is not organized pursuant to subdivision (a), the unincorporated association may continue to use its name and the corporation may not use a name which is the same as or similar to the name of the unincorporated association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

7122.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not file articles setting forth a name in which “bank,” “trust,” “trustee,” or related words appear, unless the certificate of approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is attached thereto.

(b) The Secretary of State shall not file articles pursuant to this part setting forth a name that may create the impression that the purpose of the corporation is public, charitable, or religious or that it is a charitable foundation.

(c) The name of a corporation shall not be a name that the Secretary of State determines is likely to mislead the public and shall be distinguishable
 in the records of the Secretary of State from all of the following:

(1) The name of any corporation.

(2) The name of any foreign corporation authorized to transact intrastate business in this state.

(3) Each name that is under reservation pursuant to this title.

(4) The name of a foreign corporation that has registered its name pursuant to Section 2101.

(5) An alternate name of a foreign corporation under subdivision (b) of Section 2106.

(6) A name that will become the record name of a domestic or foreign corporation upon a corporate
 instrument when there is a delayed effective or file date.

(d) The use by a corporation of a name in violation of this section may be enjoined notwithstanding the filing of its articles by the Secretary of State.
